South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3768.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Highway system construction, sunset provision SECTION 1.    SECTION 2 of Act 36 of 2019 is amended to read: SECTION 2.    The requirements of Section 57-5-880, as added by this act, expire on July 1, 2032, unless otherwise extended by the General Assembly. National Environmental Policy Act Assignment Program SECTION 2.A.    Article 7, Chapter 3, Title 57 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 57-3-790. (A) The State waives its immunity under the 11th Amendment of the United States Constitution and consents to suit in a federal court for lawsuits arising out of the department's compliance, discharge, or enforcement of responsibilities assumed pursuant to 23 U.S.C. Sections 326 and 327. The waiver of immunity under this section is valid only if: (1) the Secretary of Transportation executes a memorandum of understanding with the United States Department of Transportation accepting the jurisdiction of the federal courts as required by 23 U.S.C. Sections 326(c) and 327(c); (2) before execution of the memorandum of understanding under subsection (A), the South Carolina Attorney General has issued an opinion letter to the Secretary of Transportation and the administrator of the Federal Highway Administration that the memorandum of understanding and the waiver of immunity are valid and binding upon the State; (3) the act or omission that is the subject of the lawsuit arises out of or relates to compliance, discharge, or enforcement of responsibilities assumed by the department pursuant to 23 U.S.C. Sections 326 and 327; and (4) the memorandum of understanding is in effect when the act or omission that is the subject of the federal lawsuit occurred. (B) Within one year of submitting an application to assume administration of 23 U.S.C. Sections 326 and 327, otherwise known as the National Environmental Policy Act (NEPA) Assignment Program pursuant to this section, the secretary shall issue a NEPA Manual detailing the manner in which the department will carry out its NEPA responsibilities. The department must provide a public comment period of at least thirty days on a draft NEPA Manual prior to issuance of a final NEPA Manual. (C) The department must annually publish a report describing the department's assumption of NEPA responsibilities. The annual report must be made available to the public and posted on the department's website. That report shall include, but not be limited to, an analysis of time savings, an analysis of positive and negative financial impacts, and a summary of any legal actions challenging the department's actions under the program. (D) The Secretary of Transportation is given the authority to coordinate with the Director of the Department of Environmental Services, the Director of the Department of Natural Resources, the Director of the Department of Archives and History, and any other agency head whose agency may impact the issuance of environmental decisions necessary to expedite the delivery of transportation projects. Such agency heads must be responsive to such requests of the Secretary of Transportation. The department shall include in the report required in subsection (C) on all state agency activities related to permit and environmental decisions related to transportation projects. B.    This SECTION takes effect July 1, 2026. Time effective SECTION 3.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 20th day of May, 2026. Approved the 22nd day of May, 2026. __________